Hawaii statutes.
[§5-10.5] State musical instrument; ‘auana;
kahiko. (a) The ‘ukulele is established and designated as the official
‘auana musical instrument of the State.

(b) The pahu is established and designated as
the official kahiko musical instrument of the State. [L 2015, c 6, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next